Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. ROAD USE TAX FUND ââ FY 2025-2026. There is appropriated from the road use tax fund created in section 312.1 to the department of transportation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: a. Transportation operations: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,611,473 b. Motor vehicles: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 32,710,876 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 294.00 2. For payments to the department of administrative services and the department of management for utility services: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,878 3. For unemployment compensation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,000 Senate File 628, p. 2 4. For payments to the department of administrative services for paying workersâ compensation claims under chapter 85 on behalf of employees of the department of transportation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 153,679 5. For payment to the general fund of the state for indirect cost recoveries: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 90,000 6. For reimbursement to the auditor of state for audit expenses as provided in section 11.5B : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 107,884 7. For automation, telecommunications, and related costs associated with the county issuance of driverâs licenses and vehicle registrations and titles: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,406,000 8. For costs associated with participation in the Mississippi river parkway commission: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,000 9. For costs associated with the traffic and criminal software program and the mobile architecture and communications handling program: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 10. For motor vehicle division field facility maintenance projects at various locations: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 11. For costs associated with motor vehicle division systems modernization: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,000,000 For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided otherwise, moneys appropriated in subsections 10 and 11 that remain unencumbered or unobligated shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends three years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation was made. However, if the project or projects for which the appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same fiscal year. Sec. 2. PRIMARY ROAD FUND ââ FY 2025-2026. There is appropriated from the primary road fund created in section Senate File 628, p. 3 313.3 to the department of transportation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1. For transportation operations salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,489,821 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2,363.00 2. For payments to the department of administrative services and the department of management for utility services: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,076,822 3. For unemployment compensation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 138,000 4. For payments to the department of administrative services for paying workersâ compensation claims under chapter 85 on behalf of the employees of the department of transportation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,726,405 5. For payment to the general fund of the state for indirect cost recoveries: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 660,000 6. For reimbursement to the auditor of state for audit expenses as provided in section 11.5B : . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 662,716 7. For inventory and equipment replacement: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,818,240 8. For costs associated with the statewide interoperability network: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 442,162 9. For facility major maintenance and enhancement: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,300,000 10. For facility routine maintenance and preservation: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,050,000 11. For renovation of the Waterloo maintenance garage: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 18,897,387 For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided otherwise, moneys appropriated in subsections 9 through 11 that remain unencumbered or unobligated shall not revert but shall Senate File 628, p. 4 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that ends three years after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation was made. However, if the project or projects for which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same fiscal year. Sec. 3. Section 321.145, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) An amount necessary for the payment of costs associated with producing and distributing driverâs licenses and nonoperatorâs identification cards, not to exceed revenues derived from fees charged for driverâs licenses and nonoperatorâs identification cards, is appropriated to the department for that purpose. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 628, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor